West Virginia, session 2026, SB240.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. SALARIES, WAGES AND OTHER BENEFITS. §18A-4-4a. Overtime payments for teachers. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, teachers may receive overtime pay, if preapproved by the State Board of Education and school principal. If approved, a teacher shall receive overtime pay for the performance of any work assignment on a Saturday or a Sunday, or for the performance of any work assignment beyond the normal workweek hours. (b) The State Board of Education shall establish the rate of overtime pay for teachers and calculate overtime based upon the state minimum salary schedule for teachers in §18A-4-2 and the overtime worked:  Provided, That overtime work on a Saturday or Sunday may not be less one-half the calculated amount a teacher would receive for one day in the regular school day.